Utah statutes.
9-4-910.   Corporation -- Powers.
The corporation has and may exercise all powers necessary or appropriate to
carry out the purposes of this part, including the following:
(1)  to have perpetual succession as a body politic and corporate,
constituting a public corporation, and to adopt, amend, and repeal rules,
policies, and procedures for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of
its business;
(2)  to sue and be sued in its own name;
(3)  to have an official seal and power to alter that seal at will;
(4)  to maintain an office at any place or places within this state it may
designate;
(5)  to adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws and rules, not inconsistent with this
part, to carry into effect the powers and purposes of the corporation and the
conduct of its business;
(6)  to make and execute contracts and all other instruments necessary or
convenient for the performance of its duties and the exercise of its powers
and functions under this part, including contracts or agreements for the
servicing and originating of mortgage loans;
(7)  to employ advisers, consultants, and agents, including financial experts,
independent legal counsel, and any advisers, consultants, and agents as may be
necessary in its judgment and to fix their compensation;
(8)  to procure insurance against any loss in connection with its property and
other assets, including mortgage loans, in amounts and from insurers it
considers desirable;
(9)  to borrow money and to issue bonds and notes or other evidences of
indebtedness as provided in this part;
(10)  to receive and accept aid or contributions from any source of money,
property, labor, or other things of value to be held, used, loaned, granted,
and applied to carry out the purposes of this part subject to the conditions,
if any, upon which the grants and contributions are made, including gifts or
grants from any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States or
of this state for any purpose consistent with this part;
(11)  to enter into agreements with any local public body, any housing
sponsor, any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States or
this state, or with mortgagors and mortgage lenders for the purpose of
planning and regulating and providing for the financing and refinancing,
construction, rehabilitation, leasing, management, maintenance, operation,
sale, or other disposition of, any residential housing undertaken with the
assistance of the corporation under this part;
(12)  to exercise all of its remedies following the default under any mortgage
loan, including:
(a)  proceeding with a foreclosure action or private sale to obtain title to
the real and personal property held as collateral and taking assignments of
leases and rentals;
(b)  to own, lease, clear, reconstruct, rehabilitate, repair, maintain,
manage, and operate this property in preparation for its disposition; and
(c)  to assign, encumber, sell, or otherwise dispose of this property;
(13)  to invest any funds not required for immediate disbursement, including
funds held in reserve, in a manner consistent with applicable provisions of
Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act;
(14)  to provide technical and financial assistance to housing sponsors and
advisory committees in the development or operation of housing for low and
moderate income persons;
(15)  to gather and distribute data and information concerning the housing
needs of low and moderate income families within the various communities of
this state;
(16)  to the extent permitted under any contract with the holders of bonds,
notes, and other obligations of the corporation, to consent to any
modification with respect to rate of interest, time and payment of any
installment of principal or interest security, or any other term of any
contract, mortgage, mortgage loan, mortgage loan commitment, contract, or
agreement of any kind to which the corporation is a party;
(17)  to the extent permitted under any contract with the holders of bonds,
notes, and other obligations of the corporation, to enter into contracts with
any mortgagor or housing sponsor containing provisions enabling the mortgagor
to reduce the rental or carrying charges to persons unable to pay the regular
schedule of charges where, by reason of other income or payment by any
department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States or of this state,
the reduction can be made without jeopardizing the economic stability of
residential housing being financed;
(18)  to acquire property within this state for the purpose of holding it for
subsequent disposition to a housing sponsor or other entity that can use it
for residential housing for low and moderate income persons, except that if no
person can be found to use it in this manner, the corporation may dispose of
the property to any person;
(19)  to purchase, own and operate residential housing for the benefit, in
whole or in part, of low and moderate income persons, so long as the
corporation makes reasonable efforts to sell that residential housing to a
housing sponsor;
(20)  to incorporate or form one or more subsidiaries of the corporation for
the purpose of carrying out any of the powers of the corporation and
accomplishing any of the purposes of the corporation, to invest in and provide
financial assistance to these subsidiaries, to borrow from these subsidiaries,
to guarantee the obligations of these subsidiaries, and to enter into
agreements with these subsidiaries to carry out any of the corporation's
powers under this part;
(21)  to enter into partnership and limited liability company agreements, to
purchase and sell interests in housing sponsors, to serve as general partner
of a partnership, and to serve as a manager of a limited liability company to
carry out any of the corporation's powers under this part;
(22)  to require that persons receiving a mortgage loan or financial
assistance from the corporation subject the property involved to restrictive
covenants that shall be considered to be running with the land, regardless of
whether or not the corporation enjoys privity of estate or whether or not the
covenant touches and concerns the burdened property;
(23)  to enter into management agreements with any person or entity for the
performance by the person or entity for the corporation of any of its
functions or powers, with terms and conditions as may be mutually agreeable;
(24)  to sell, at public or private sale, with or without public bidding, any
mortgage loan or other obligation held by the corporation;
(25)  to sell or convey real property owned by the corporation to low or
moderate income persons and housing sponsors, without consideration if the
sale or conveyance will inure primarily to the benefit of low or moderate
income persons living in a housing development;
(26)  upon making a determination that the financial status of a housing
development will jeopardize any economic interest of the corporation in the
housing development, to assume managerial and financial control of the
property or the owner and to supervise and prescribe the activities of the
property or the owner in a manner and under terms and conditions as the
corporation may stipulate in any contract;
(27)  to supervise housing sponsors of housing developments;
(28)  to service mortgage loans;
(29)  to give consideration to those activities which promote the availability
of accessible housing; and
(30)  to do any act necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers
granted in or reasonably implied from this part.
